Massachusetts, session 194th, H3579.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 29. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, prior to the 
installation of any offshore wind turbine, the secretary shall commission a study of the potential 
environmental impact of the installation and operation of such offshore wind turbine. The study 
shall investigate the potential impacts of the installation and operation of offshore wind turbines 
on the area surrounding the proposed site of installation and operation, including, but not limited 
to, the impact on the water, the ocean floor and the marine life in the surrounding area. 
(b) The secretary shall file a report, including any findings on the environmental impact 
of proposed offshore wind turbines, to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate and 

of 2 10 the joint committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture no less than 180 days 
before the installation of proposed offshore wind turbines is set to begin.